Maryland, session 2026, HB1539.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
TITLE 4.5. MARYLAND LABOR RELATIONS ACT.
SUBTITLE 1. DEFINITIONS; GENERAL PROVISIONS.
4.5–101.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1539*

HOUSE BILL 1539
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “BOARD” MEANS THE MARYLAND LABOR RELATIONS BOARD.
(C) (1) “EMPLOYEE” INCLUDES AN INDIVIDUAL:
(I) WHOSE WORK HAS CEASED AS A CONSEQUENCE OF, OR IN
CONNECTION WITH, AN EXISTING LABOR DISPUTE OR BECAUSE OF AN UNFAIR
LABOR PRACTICE; AND
(II) WHO HAS NOT OBTAINED OTHER REGULAR AND
SUBSTANTIALLY EQUIVALENT EMPLOYMENT.
(2) “EMPLOYEE” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN INDIVIDUAL EMPLOYED:
(I) AS AN AGRICULTURAL LABORER;
(II) IN DOMESTIC SERVICE OF A FAMILY OR AN INDIVIDUAL IN
THE HOME OF THE FAMILY OR INDIVIDUAL;
(III) BY THE INDIVIDUAL’S PARENT OR SPOUSE;
(IV) AS AN INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR;
(V) BY AN EMPLOYER SUBJECT TO THE FEDERAL RAILWAY
LABOR ACT; OR
(VI) AS A SUPERVISORY EMPLOYEE.
(D) “EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION” MEANS A LABOR ORGANIZATION IN WHICH
EMPLOYEES PARTICIPATE AND THAT HAS AS ONE OF ITS PRIMARY PURPOSES
REPRESENTING EMPLOYEES.
(E) “EMPLOYER” INCLUDES ANY PERSON ACTING AS AN AGENT OF AN
EMPLOYER, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY.
(F) “EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE” MEANS AN EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION
THAT HAS BEEN CERTIFIED BY THE BOARD AS AN EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE.
(G) “SUPERVISORY EMPLOYEE” MEANS AN EMPLOYEE WITH THE
AUTHORITY, IN THE INTEREST OF THE EMPLOYER, TO:

HOUSE BILL 1539 3
(1) HIRE, TRANSFER, SUSPEND, LAY OFF, RECALL, PROMOTE,
DISCHARGE, ASSIGN, REWARD, OR DISCIPLINE EMPLOYEES;
(2) RESPONSIBLY DIRECT EMPLOYEES FOR MORE THAN 50% OF THE
EMPLOYEES’ WORKING HOURS; OR
(3) ADDRESS AND RESOLVE THE GRIEVANCES OF EMPLOYEES.
4.5–102.
THIS TITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO INTERFERE WITH, IMPEDE, OR
DIMINISH AN EMPLOYEE’S RIGHT TO STRIKE.
SUBTITLE 2. MARYLAND LABOR RELATIONS BOARD.
4.5–201.
THERE IS A MARYLAND LABOR RELATIONS BOARD AS AN INDEPENDENT UNIT
OF STATE GOVERNMENT.
4.5–202.
(A) THE GOVERNOR SHALL APPOINT, WITH THE ADVICE AND CONSENT OF
THE SENATE:
(1) A CHAIR OF THE BOARD; AND
(2) FOUR MEMBERS OF THE BOARD.
(B) EACH MEMBER OF THE BOARD MUST:
(1) HAVE KNOWLEDGE OF AND EXPERIENCE WITH LABOR LAW, LABOR
MEDIATION, OR LABOR NEGOTIATIONS; AND
(2) BE KNOWN FOR OBJECTIVE AND INDEPENDENT JUDGMENT.
(C) (1) THE TERM OF A BOARD MEMBER IS 5 YEARS.
(2) THE TERMS OF THE MEMBERS ARE STAGGERED BY THE TERMS
PROVIDED FOR MEMBERS OF THE BOARD ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF CHAPTER
_____ (H.B. 1539) OF THE ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF 2026.

HOUSE BILL 1539
(3) A VACANCY SHALL BE FILLED FOR AN UNEXPIRED TERM IN THE
SAME MANNER AS AN ORIGINAL APPOINTMENT.
(4) AT THE END OF THE TERM, A MEMBER CONTINUES TO SERVE
UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND QUALIFIES.
(5) A MEMBER WHO IS APPOINTED AFTER A TERM HAS BEGUN SERVES
ONLY FOR THE REST OF THE TERM AND UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND
QUALIFIES.
(D) THE GOVERNOR MAY REMOVE A BOARD MEMBER FOR:
(1) INCOMPETENCE;
(2) MISCONDUCT;
(3) UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT; OR
(4) DISHONORABLE CONDUCT.
(E) IN MAKING APPOINTMENTS TO THE BOARD, THE GOVERNOR SHALL
ENSURE, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THAT THE RATIO OF MALE TO FEMALE
MEMBERS AND THE RACIAL MAKEUP OF THE BOARD IS REFLECTIVE OF THE
GENERAL POPULATION OF THE STATE.
(F) (1) A BOARD MEMBER IS ENTITLED TO:
(I) THE COMPENSATION PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET;
AND
(II) REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE STANDARD
STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(2) THE CHAIR OF THE BOARD SHALL GIVE FULL–TIME TO THE
DUTIES OF CHAIR AND IS ENTITLED TO A SALARY AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE
BUDGET.
(G) THE BOARD SHALL SET THE TIMES AND PLACES OF ITS MEETINGS.
(H) THREE MEMBERS OF THE BOARD SHALL CONSTITUTE A QUORUM FOR:
(1) THE TRANSACTION OF ANY BUSINESS; OR

HOUSE BILL 1539 5
(2) THE EXERCISE OF ANY POWER OR THE PERFORMANCE OF ANY
DUTY AUTHORIZED OR IMPOSED BY LAW.
4.5–203.
(A) THE BOARD IS RESPONSIBLE FOR ADMINISTERING AND ENFORCING
THIS TITLE.
(B) IN ADDITION TO THE POWERS AND DUTIES OTHERWISE PROVIDED
UNDER THIS TITLE, THE BOARD MAY:
(1) ESTABLISH PROCEDURES FOR, SUPERVISE THE CONDUCT OF, AND
RESOLVE DISPUTES REGARDING ELECTIONS FOR EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVES;
(2) ESTABLISH PROCEDURES FOR AND RESOLVE DISPUTES
REGARDING PETITIONS FOR BARGAINING UNIT CLARIFICATION;
(3) ESTABLISH PROCEDURES FOR AND RESOLVE DISPUTES
REGARDING PETITIONS AND ELECTIONS FOR DECERTIFICATION OF AN EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVE;
(4) INVESTIGATE AND TAKE APPROPRIATE ACTION IN RESPONSE TO
CHARGES OF UNFAIR LABOR PRACTICES; AND
(5) ESTABLISH PROCEDURES FOR AND RESOLVE DISPUTES
REGARDING THE NEGOTIABILITY OF BARGAINING SUBJECTS.
(C) THE BOARD SHALL HAVE BROAD DISCRETION TO TAKE AND ORDER
REMEDIAL ACTIONS WHEN IT FINDS THAT A PARTY HAS COMMITTED AN UNFAIR
LABOR PRACTICE, INCLUDING THE RESTORATION OF ANY RIGHT, PAY, STATUS, OR
BENEFIT LOST BY AN EMPLOYEE OR GROUP OF EMPLOYEES DUE TO VIOLATIONS OF
THIS TITLE.
(D) TO ENFORCE THIS TITLE, THE BOARD MAY:
(1) ISSUE SUBPOENAS; AND
(2) ADMINISTER OATHS AND AFFIRMATIONS, EXAMINE WITNESSES,
AND RECEIVE EVIDENCE.
SUBTITLE 3. RIGHTS AND DUTIES OF EMPLOYEES, EMPLOYERS, AND EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVES.

HOUSE BILL 1539
4.5–301.
(A) EMPLOYEES HAVE THE RIGHT TO:
(1) ENGAGE IN CONCERTED ACTIVITIES FOR THE PURPOSES OF
MUTUAL AID OR PROTECTION;
(2) REFRAIN FROM ANY OR ALL ACTIVITIES DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION;
(3) FORM, JOIN, AND PARTICIPATE IN, OR REFRAIN FROM FORMING,
JOINING, OR PARTICIPATING IN ANY EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION OF THEIR OWN
CHOOSING;
(4) BE REPRESENTED BY EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATIONS AND
NEGOTIATE COLLECTIVELY WITH THEIR EMPLOYERS IN THE DETERMINATION OF
THEIR TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT AND THE ADMINISTRATION OF
GRIEVANCES ARISING UNDER EMPLOYMENT; AND
(5) BE FAIRLY REPRESENTED BY THEIR EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVE, IF ANY, IN COLLECTIVE BARGAINING.
(B) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, AN
EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION MAY ESTABLISH REASONABLE:
(1) RESTRICTIONS AS TO WHO MAY JOIN; AND
(2) PROVISIONS FOR THE DISMISSAL OF INDIVIDUALS FROM
MEMBERSHIP.
(C) AN EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION MAY NOT ESTABLISH RESTRICTIONS AND
PROVISIONS UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION THAT DISCRIMINATE WITH
REGARD TO THE TERMS OR CONDITIONS OF MEMBERSHIP BECAUSE OF:
(1) AGE;
(2) ANCESTRY;
(3) COLOR;
(4) CREED;
(5) GENDER IDENTITY;

HOUSE BILL 1539 7
(6) MARITAL STATUS;
(7) MENTAL OR PHYSICAL DISABILITY;
(8) NATIONAL ORIGIN;
(9) RACE;
(10) RELIGIOUS AFFILIATION, BELIEF, OR OPINION;
(11) SEX; OR
(12) SEXUAL ORIENTATION.
4.5–302.
AN EMPLOYER SHALL EXTEND TO AN EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE THE
RIGHT TO:
(1) REPRESENT EMPLOYEES IN:
(I) NEGOTIATIONS NOTWITHSTANDING THE EXISTENCE OF AN
AGREEMENT WITH AN EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION THAT IS NO LONGER CERTIFIED OR
RECOGNIZED; AND
(II) THE SETTLEMENT OF GRIEVANCES;
(2) (I) ON REQUEST, INFORMATION FROM THE EMPLOYER
RELEVANT TO THE ADMINISTRATION AND NEGOTIATION OF AN AGREEMENT OR THE
PROPER PERFORMANCE OF THE EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION’S DUTIES AS THE
EMPLOYEES’ REPRESENTATIVE; AND
(II) HAVE THE INFORMATION REQUESTED UNDER ITEM (I) OF
THIS ITEM MADE AVAILABLE AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE, BUT NOT LATER THAN 30
DAYS AFTER THE EMPLOYER RECEIVES THE REQUEST; AND
(3) COMMUNICATE WITH THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE’S
MEMBERS AND ELECTED OFFICIALS, IN A MANNER AND AT TIMES AT THE EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVE’S DISCRETION, CONCERNING ISSUES RELEVANT TO THE
ADMINISTRATION AND NEGOTIATION OF AN AGREEMENT.
4.5–303.

HOUSE BILL 1539
(A) AN EMPLOYER HAS THE RIGHT TO:
(1) DETERMINE HOW THE GOALS OF THE EMPLOYER, INCLUDING THE
FUNCTIONS AND PROGRAMS OF THE EMPLOYER, THE EMPLOYER’S OVERALL
BUDGET, AND THE EMPLOYER’S ORGANIZATIONAL STRUCTURE, ARE TO BE CARRIED
OUT; AND
(2) DIRECT EMPLOYEES OF THE EMPLOYER.
(B) AN EMPLOYER OR AN EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION MAY NOT INTERFERE
WITH, INTIMIDATE, RESTRAIN, COERCE, OR DISCRIMINATE AGAINST AN EMPLOYEE
BECAUSE THE EMPLOYEE EXERCISES RIGHTS GRANTED UNDER THIS TITLE.
4.5–304.
(A) AN EMPLOYER AND ITS OFFICERS, EMPLOYEES, AGENTS, OR
REPRESENTATIVES MAY NOT ENGAGE IN AN UNFAIR LABOR PRACTICE, INCLUDING:
(1) INTERFERING WITH, RESTRAINING, OR COERCING EMPLOYEES IN
THE EXERCISE OF THE EMPLOYEES’ RIGHTS UNDER THIS TITLE;
(2) DOMINATING, INTERFERING WITH, CONTRIBUTING FINANCIAL OR
OTHER SUPPORT TO, OR ASSISTING IN THE FORMATION, EXISTENCE, OR
ADMINISTRATION OF AN EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION;
(3) GRANTING ADMINISTRATIVE LEAVE TO EMPLOYEES TO ATTEND
EMPLOYER SPONSORED OR SUPPORTED MEETINGS OR EVENTS RELATING TO AN
ELECTION UNDER THIS TITLE, UNLESS THE EMPLOYER GRANTS EMPLOYEES AT
LEAST THE SAME AMOUNT OF ADMINISTRATIVE LEAVE TO ATTEND LABOR
ORGANIZATION SPONSORED OR SUPPORTED MEETINGS OR EMPLOYEE MEETINGS;
(4) DISCRIMINATING IN HIRING, TENURE, OR A TERM OR CONDITION
OF EMPLOYMENT TO ENCOURAGE OR DISCOURAGE MEMBERSHIP IN AN EMPLOYEE
ORGANIZATION;
(5) DISCHARGING OR DISCRIMINATING AGAINST AN EMPLOYEE
BECAUSE OF THE SIGNING OR FILING OF AN AFFIDAVIT, A PETITION, OR A
COMPLAINT, OR GIVING INFORMATION OR TESTIMONY IN CONNECTION WITH
MATTERS ARISING UNDER THIS TITLE;

HOUSE BILL 1539 9
(6) FAILING TO PROVIDE ALL EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATIONS INVOLVED
IN AN ELECTION THE SAME RIGHTS OF ACCESS AS REQUIRED BY THE BOARD
THROUGH REGULATION;
(7) ENGAGING IN SURVEILLANCE OF UNION ACTIVITIES;
(8) REFUSING TO BARGAIN IN GOOD FAITH; OR
(9) FAILING TO MEET AN ESTABLISHED NEGOTIATION DEADLINE,
UNLESS A WRITTEN AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE EMPLOYER AND THE EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVE PROVIDES OTHERWISE.
(B) EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATIONS AND THEIR AGENTS OR REPRESENTATIVES
ARE PROHIBITED FROM ENGAGING IN AN UNFAIR LABOR PRACTICE, INCLUDING:
(1) INTERFERING WITH, RESTRAINING, OR COERCING EMPLOYEES IN
THE EXERCISE OF THE EMPLOYEES’ RIGHTS UNDER THIS TITLE;
(2) CAUSING OR ATTEMPTING TO CAUSE AN EMPLOYER TO
DISCRIMINATE IN HIRING, TENURE, OR A TERM OR CONDITION OF EMPLOYMENT TO
ENCOURAGE OR DISCOURAGE MEMBERSHIP IN AN EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION;
(3) REFUSING TO BARGAIN IN GOOD FAITH; OR
(4) NOT FAIRLY REPRESENTING EMPLOYEES IN COLLECTIVE
BARGAINING OR IN ANY OTHER MATTER IN WHICH THE EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION
HAS THE DUTY OF FAIR REPRESENTATION.
4.5–305.
(A) EACH EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE HAS THE RIGHT TO COMMUNICATE
WITH THE EMPLOYEES THAT IT REPRESENTS.
(B) (1) AN EMPLOYER SHALL ALLOW AN EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE
TO:
(I) MEET WITH A NEW EMPLOYEE IN A BARGAINING UNIT
REPRESENTED BY THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE WITHIN THE FIRST FULL PAY
PERIOD OF THE NEW EMPLOYEE’S START DATE; OR
(II) ATTEND AND PARTICIPATE IN A NEW EMPLOYEE PROGRAM
THAT INCLUDES ONE OR MORE EMPLOYEES WHO ARE IN A BARGAINING UNIT
REPRESENTED BY THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE.

HOUSE BILL 1539
(2) THE NEW EMPLOYEE PROGRAM DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1)(II)
OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE A NEW EMPLOYEE ORIENTATION, TRAINING, OR OTHER
PROGRAM THAT THE EMPLOYER AND AN EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE NEGOTIATE.
(3) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE SHALL BE ALLOWED AT LEAST 30 MINUTES TO MEET
WITH THE NEW EMPLOYEE OR TO COLLECTIVELY ADDRESS ALL NEW EMPLOYEES IN
ATTENDANCE DURING A NEW EMPLOYEE PROGRAM.
(II) AN EMPLOYER AND AN EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE MAY
NEGOTIATE A PERIOD OF TIME THAT IS MORE THAN 30 MINUTES.
(4) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, A MEETING BETWEEN THE NEW EMPLOYEE AND THE EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVE SHALL BE IN PERSON.
(II) AN EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE MAY CHOOSE TO MEET
WITH A NEW EMPLOYEE BY VIDEO OR SIMILAR TECHNOLOGY.
(5) AN EMPLOYER:
(I) SHALL ENCOURAGE AN EMPLOYEE TO MEET WITH THE
EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE OR ATTEND THE PORTION OF A NEW EMPLOYEE
PROGRAM DESIGNATED FOR AN EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE TO ADDRESS NEW
EMPLOYEES; AND
(II) MAY NOT REQUIRE AN EMPLOYEE TO MEET WITH AN
EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE OR ATTEND THE PORTION OF A NEW EMPLOYEE
PROGRAM DESIGNATED FOR AN EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE TO ADDRESS NEW
EMPLOYEES IF THE EMPLOYEE OBJECTS TO ATTENDING.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION
AND SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN EMPLOYER SHALL
PROVIDE THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE AT LEAST 10 DAYS’ NOTICE OF THE
START DATE OF A NEW EMPLOYEE IN A BARGAINING UNIT REPRESENTED BY THE
EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE.
(2) AN EMPLOYER MAY PROVIDE THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE
WITH LESS THAN 10 DAYS’ NOTICE IF THERE IS AN URGENT NEED CRITICAL TO THE
EMPLOYER THAT WAS NOT REASONABLY FORESEEABLE.

HOUSE BILL 1539 11
(3) THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) BE PROVIDED ELECTRONICALLY TO THE LOCAL PRESIDENT
OR EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE DESIGNEE WITHIN 5 DAYS OF THE START OF ANY
CHECK–IN EVENT THE EMPLOYER OBLIGATES THE EMPLOYEE TO ATTEND;
(II) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN ITEM (III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH,
INCLUDE THE NEW EMPLOYEE’S NAME, UNIT, AND ALL EMPLOYEE IDENTIFICATION
NUMBERS;
(III) EXCLUDE THE NEW EMPLOYEE’S SOCIAL SECURITY
NUMBER; AND
(IV) BE CONSIDERED CONFIDENTIAL BY AN EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVE.
(4) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, AN EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE MAY NOT DISCLOSE THE
INFORMATION IN A NOTICE.
(II) THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE MAY AUTHORIZE A
THIRD–PARTY CONTRACTOR TO USE THE INFORMATION IN A NOTICE, AS DIRECTED
BY THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE, TO FULFILL THE EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVE’S STATUTORY DUTIES.
4.5–306.
AN EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION CERTIFIED AS THE EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVE SHALL:
(1) SERVE AS THE SOLE AND EXCLUSIVE BARGAINING AGENT FOR ALL
EMPLOYEES IN THE BARGAINING UNIT;
(2) REPRESENT FAIRLY AND WITHOUT DISCRIMINATION ALL
EMPLOYEES IN THE BARGAINING UNIT, WHETHER OR NOT THE EMPLOYEES ARE
MEMBERS OF THE EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION OR ARE PAYING DUES OR OTHER
CONTRIBUTIONS TO IT OR PARTICIPATING IN ITS AFFAIRS; AND
(3) PROMPTLY FILE WITH THE BOARD ALL CHANGES AND
AMENDMENTS TO THE EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION’S GOVERNING DOCUMENTS.
4.5–307.

HOUSE BILL 1539
(A) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE AN EMPLOYEE TO
BECOME A MEMBER OF AN EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION.
(B) AN EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION IS ENTITLED TO MEMBERSHIP DUES
DEDUCTION ON PRESENTATION BY THE EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION OF:
(1) A DUES DEDUCTION AUTHORIZATION CARD;
(2) AN ELECTRONIC MEMBERSHIP APPLICATION; OR
(3) OTHER PROOF DOCUMENTING THAT AN EMPLOYEE HAS
ASSENTED TO MEMBERSHIP DUES DEDUCTION.
(C) (1) AN EMPLOYER SHALL COMMENCE MAKING DUES DEDUCTIONS AS
SOON AS PRACTICABLE, BUT NOT LATER THAN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE
PROOF PRESENTED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) AN EMPLOYER SHALL TRANSMIT MEMBERSHIP DUES TO THE
EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE DEDUCTIONS ARE MADE.
(3) AN EMPLOYER SHALL ACCEPT AN AUTHORIZATION TO DEDUCT
FROM THE SALARY OF AN EMPLOYEE AN AMOUNT FOR THE PAYMENT OF DUES IN
ANY FORMAT AUTHORIZED UNDER § 21–106 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
SUBTITLE 4. ELECTIONS AND CERTIFICATIONS OF EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVES.
4.5–401.
(A) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SUBTITLE, THE BOARD
SHALL CONDUCT AN ELECTION FOR AN EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE OF A
BARGAINING UNIT IF:
(1) A VALID PETITION IS FILED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 4.5–402 OF
THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) THE BARGAINING UNIT INVOLVED IN THE PETITION IS
DETERMINED TO BE AN APPROPRIATE BARGAINING UNIT UNDER § 4.5–403 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(B) THE BOARD MAY NOT CONDUCT AN ELECTION FOR AN EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVE OF A BARGAINING UNIT IF THE BOARD HAS CONDUCTED AN

HOUSE BILL 1539 13
ELECTION OR CERTIFIED AN EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE FOR THAT BARGAINING
UNIT WITHIN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 12 MONTHS.
(C) (1) AN EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE OR A BARGAINING UNIT IN
EXISTENCE BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF CHAPTER _____ (H.B.1539) OF THE
ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF 2026 SHALL CONTINUE:
(I) WITHOUT THE REQUIREMENT OF AN ELECTION AND
CERTIFICATION UNTIL A QUESTION CONCERNING REPRESENTATION IS RAISED
UNDER THIS TITLE; OR
(II) UNTIL THE BOARD FINDS THE UNIT NOT TO BE
APPROPRIATE AFTER CHALLENGE BY THE EMPLOYER, A MEMBER OF THE UNIT, OR
AN EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION.
(2) (I) THE APPROPRIATENESS OF THE UNIT MAY NOT BE
CHALLENGED UNTIL THE EXPIRATION OF ANY COLLECTIVE BARGAINING
AGREEMENT.
(II) THE BOARD MAY NOT MODIFY ANY BARGAINING UNIT
DETERMINED UNDER EXISTING LAW.
4.5–402.
(A) A PETITION FOR THE ELECTION OF AN EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE OF
A BARGAINING UNIT MAY BE FILED WITH THE BOARD BY:
(1) AN EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION SEEKING CERTIFICATION AS AN
EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE; OR
(2) AN EMPLOYEE, A GROUP OF EMPLOYEES, OR AN EMPLOYEE
ORGANIZATION SEEKING A NEW ELECTION TO DETERMINE AN EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVE.
(B) A PETITION SHALL:
(1) CONTAIN THE INFORMATION THE BOARD REQUIRES; AND
(2) BE ACCOMPANIED BY SHOWING OF INTEREST FORMS FROM AT
LEAST 30% OF THE EMPLOYEES IN THE APPROPRIATE UNIT INDICATING THEIR
DESIRE TO BE EXCLUSIVELY REPRESENTED BY THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE
NAMED IN THE PETITION FOR THE PURPOSE OF COLLECTIVE BARGAINING.

HOUSE BILL 1539
(C) IF THE BOARD DETERMINES THAT A REQUIRED SHOWING OF INTEREST
IS NOT ADEQUATE, THE BOARD:
(1) SHALL ALLOW AN ADDITIONAL 30 DAYS FOR THE PETITIONER TO
SUBMIT ADDITIONAL SHOWING OF INTEREST FORMS AFTER THE PETITIONER IS
NOTIFIED OF THE DETERMINATION; AND
(2) MAY, FOR GOOD CAUSE, PROVIDE ADDITIONAL TIME TO THE
PETITIONER TO PROVIDE ADDITIONAL FORMS.
(D) IF A PETITION IS SUPPORTED BY MORE THAN 50% OF THE EMPLOYEES
IN THE BARGAINING UNIT, THE EMPLOYER SHALL IMMEDIATELY RECOGNIZE THE
EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION AS THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE AND AFFORD TO
THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE AND ITS MEMBERS ALL RIGHTS DUE UNDER THIS
TITLE.
(E) (1) A PETITION FILED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL INCLUDE SHOWING OF INTEREST FORMS PROVIDED TO THE BOARD FROM AN
EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION.
(2) THE BOARD SHALL ACCEPT A SHOWING OF INTEREST FORM
WHETHER THE SIGNATURES ON THE FORM ARE ELECTRONIC OR HANDWRITTEN.
(3) (I) FOR AN ELECTION THAT IS CONDUCTED TO DETERMINE
WHETHER AN EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE SHOULD REPRESENT A UNIT, A
SHOWING OF INTEREST FORM IS VALID IF THE SIGNATURES WERE COLLECTED
WITHIN THE 18–MONTH PERIOD IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE DATE ON WHICH A
PETITION FOR THE ELECTION IS FILED.
(II) FOR AN ELECTION THAT IS CONDUCTED TO DETERMINE
WHETHER AN EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE SHOULD NO LONGER REPRESENT A
UNIT, A SHOWING OF INTEREST FORM IS VALID IF THE SIGNATURES WERE
COLLECTED WITHIN THE 9–MONTH PERIOD IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE DATE ON
WHICH THE PETITION FOR ELECTION IS FILED.
(4) A SHOWING OF INTEREST FORM MAY BE USED BY AN EMPLOYEE
FOR EACH EMPLOYER THAT EMPLOYS THE EMPLOYEE.
(F) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN EMPLOYER
SHALL PROVIDE TO THE BOARD AND THE EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION AN
ALPHABETICAL LIST OF EMPLOYEES IN EACH BARGAINING UNIT WITHIN 2 DAYS
AFTER A PETITION FOR AN ELECTION IS FILED.

HOUSE BILL 1539 15
(2) THE LIST REQUIRED TO BE PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) INCLUDE FOR EACH EMPLOYEE ON THE PAYROLL FOR THE
LAST PAY PERIOD BEFORE A PETITION FOR ELECTION IS FILED, THE EMPLOYEE’S:
1. NAME;
2. JOB TITLE AND DESCRIPTION;
3. HOME AND WORK SITE ADDRESSES WHERE THE
EMPLOYEE RECEIVES INTEROFFICE OR UNITED STATES MAIL;
4. HOME AND WORK SITE TELEPHONE NUMBERS;
5. PERSONAL CELL PHONE NUMBER; AND
6. WORK E–MAIL ADDRESS; AND
(II) IDENTIFY EACH EMPLOYEE THAT SHOULD BE EXCLUDED AS
AN ELIGIBLE VOTER WITH A STATEMENT EXPLAINING THE REASON FOR THE
EXCLUSION.
(3) AN EMPLOYER MAY NOT CHALLENGE THE ELIGIBILITY OF AN
EMPLOYEE’S VOTE IN AN ELECTION IF THE EMPLOYER FAILS TO EXPLAIN THE
REASON FOR EXCLUDING AN EMPLOYEE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, AS REQUIRED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
4.5–403.
(A) (1) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS TITLE, THE BOARD
SHALL DETERMINE THE APPROPRIATENESS OF EACH BARGAINING UNIT.
(2) IF THERE IS NO DISPUTE ABOUT THE APPROPRIATENESS OF THE
ESTABLISHMENT OF THE BARGAINING UNIT, THE BOARD SHALL ISSUE AN ORDER
DEFINING AN APPROPRIATE BARGAINING UNIT.
(3) IF THERE IS A DISPUTE ABOUT THE APPROPRIATENESS OF THE
ESTABLISHMENT OF THE BARGAINING UNIT, THE BOARD SHALL:
(I) CONDUCT A HEARING; AND

HOUSE BILL 1539
(II) ISSUE AN ORDER DEFINING AN APPROPRIATE BARGAINING
UNIT.
(B) IF THE APPROPRIATE BARGAINING UNIT AS DETERMINED BY THE
BOARD DIFFERS FROM THE BARGAINING UNIT DESCRIBED IN THE PETITION, THE
BOARD MAY:
(1) DISMISS THE PETITION; OR
(2) DIRECT AN ELECTION IN THE APPROPRIATE BARGAINING UNIT IF
AT LEAST 30% OF THE SIGNATURES INCLUDED IN THE PETITION ARE OF EMPLOYEES
IN THE APPROPRIATE BARGAINING UNIT.
4.5–404.
EACH EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION THAT SEEKS CERTIFICATION AS AN
EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE SHALL FILE WITH THE BOARD:
(1) A COPY OF THE EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION’S GOVERNING
DOCUMENTS THAT:
(I) GIVE INDIVIDUAL MEMBERS THE RIGHT TO PARTICIPATE IN
ACTIVITIES OF THE ORGANIZATION;
(II) REQUIRE PERIODIC ELECTIONS BY SECRET BALLOT THAT
ARE CONDUCTED WITH RECOGNIZED SAFEGUARDS TO ENSURE THE EQUAL RIGHTS
OF ALL MEMBERS TO NOMINATE, SEEK OFFICE, AND VOTE IN THE ELECTIONS; AND
(III) DIRECT FULL AND ACCURATE ACCOUNTING OF ALL INCOME
AND EXPENSES USING STANDARD ACCOUNTING METHODS; AND
(2) A CERTIFICATION THAT THE EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION ACCEPTS
MEMBERS WITHOUT REGARD TO ANY CHARACTERISTIC LISTED IN § 4.5–301(C) OF
THIS TITLE.
4.5–405.
(A) (1) WITHIN 5 DAYS AFTER DETERMINING THAT A VALID PETITION HAS
BEEN SUBMITTED UNDER § 4.5–402 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE BOARD SHALL NOTIFY
INTERESTED EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATIONS OF THE PENDING ELECTION PETITION.
(2) WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER DETERMINING THAT A VALID PETITION
HAS BEEN SUBMITTED UNDER § 4.5–402 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE EMPLOYER, AS

HOUSE BILL 1539 17
APPROPRIATE, SHALL MAKE AVAILABLE TO ALL INTERESTED EMPLOYEE
ORGANIZATIONS REASONABLE AND EQUIVALENT MEANS TO COMMUNICATE BY MAIL
AND IN PERSON WITH EACH EMPLOYEE IN THE APPROPRIATE BARGAINING UNIT FOR
THE PURPOSE OF SOLICITING THE EMPLOYEE’S VOTE IN AN ELECTION HELD UNDER
THIS SECTION.
(B) AN ELECTION SHALL BE HELD IN A BARGAINING UNIT WITHIN 90 DAYS
AFTER THE FILING OF A VALID PETITION FOR ELECTION IN THE BARGAINING UNIT
IN ACCORDANCE WITH GUIDELINES ESTABLISHED BY THE BOARD.
(C) (1) (I) THE BOARD SHALL CONDUCT THE ELECTION:
1. BY SECRET BALLOT; AND
2. SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, IN WHOLE OR IN PART BY IN–PERSON VOTING, MAIL, OR AN
ELECTRONIC VOTING SYSTEM.
(II) THE BOARD MAY DESIGNATE THE TIME PERIOD FOR
IN–PERSON VOTING ONLY AFTER CONSULTING WITH THE EMPLOYER AND
EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATIONS ON THE BALLOT.
(III) 1. THE BOARD SHALL ALLOW AT LEAST 10 DAYS OF
VOTING FOR AN ELECTION CONDUCTED BY MAIL OR AN ELECTRONIC VOTING
SYSTEM UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, UNLESS AN EMPLOYEE
ORGANIZATION ON THE BALLOT REQUESTS AN EXTENSION.
2. IF THE VOTING SYSTEM IS INOPERABLE, THE BOARD
MAY EXTEND THE TIME PERIOD FOR VOTING.
(2) (I) AN EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION ON A BALLOT MAY REQUEST
A PREFERRED METHOD OF VOTING AT THE TIME A PETITION FOR ELECTION IS FILED
WITH THE BOARD.
(II) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE BOARD SHALL DESIGNATE THE METHOD OF VOTING BASED ON
THE REQUESTS OF THE EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATIONS ON THE BALLOT.
(III) IF THERE IS A DISPUTE BETWEEN TWO OR MORE EMPLOYEE
ORGANIZATIONS ON THE BALLOT OVER THE METHOD OF VOTING, THE BOARD MAY
DESIGNATE THE METHOD OF VOTING.

HOUSE BILL 1539
(3) THE BOARD SHALL PLACE THE FOLLOWING CHOICES ON THE
BALLOT:
(I) THE NAME OF THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE, IF ANY;
(II) THE NAME OF THE EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION DESIGNATED
IN THE PETITION FILED UNDER § 4.5–402 OF THIS SUBTITLE WITH RESPECT TO AN
APPROPRIATE BARGAINING UNIT;
(III) THE NAME OF EACH EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION
DESIGNATED IN A PETITION FILED WITH THE BOARD:
1. WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER NOTICE OF THE PENDING
ELECTION PETITION; AND
2. THAT INCLUDES THE SIGNATURES OF AT LEAST 10%
OF THE EMPLOYEES IN THE APPROPRIATE BARGAINING UNIT; AND
(IV) A PROVISION FOR “NO EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE”.
(D) IF NONE OF THE CHOICES ON A BALLOT RECEIVES A MAJORITY OF THE
VOTES CAST IN AN ELECTION, THE BOARD SHALL CONDUCT A RUNOFF ELECTION
BETWEEN THE CHOICES THAT RECEIVED THE TWO HIGHEST NUMBER OF VOTES IN
THE ELECTION.
4.5–406.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE
BOARD SHALL CERTIFY AS EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE THE EMPLOYEE
ORGANIZATION RECEIVING THE VOTES IN AN ELECTION FROM A MAJORITY OF THE
EMPLOYEES VOTING IN THE ELECTION.
(B) AFTER NOTICE AND AN OPPORTUNITY FOR A HEARING, THE BOARD MAY
DENY OR REVOKE CERTIFICATION AS EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE OF AN
EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION FOR WILLFUL FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH THIS TITLE.
(C) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE
BOARD SHALL CERTIFY THE EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION AS THE EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVE WITHOUT AN ELECTION IF:
(1) A PETITION FOR AN EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE HAS BEEN
FILED FOR A BARGAINING UNIT;

HOUSE BILL 1539 19
(2) THE BOARD FINDS THAT A MAJORITY OF THE EMPLOYEES IN THE
BARGAINING UNIT HAVE SIGNED VALID AUTHORIZATIONS DESIGNATING THE
EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION AS THEIR EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE; AND
(3) NO OTHER EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION IS CURRENTLY CERTIFIED
OR RECOGNIZED AS THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE BARGAINING UNIT.
4.5–407.
NAMES OR LISTS OF EMPLOYEES PROVIDED TO THE BOARD IN CONNECTION
WITH AN ELECTION UNDER THIS SUBTITLE ARE NOT SUBJECT TO DISCLOSURE
UNDER THE PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT.
SUBTITLE 5. REGULATIONS AND REPORTING.
4.5–501.
ON OR BEFORE FEBRUARY 1 EACH YEAR, THE BOARD SHALL SUBMIT A
REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT SUMMARIZES
SIGNIFICANT CASES AND ACTIONS TAKEN IN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING
CALENDAR YEAR.
4.5–502.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE BOARD SHALL
ADOPT AND ENFORCE REGULATIONS, GUIDELINES, AND POLICIES TO CARRY OUT
THIS TITLE.
(B) THE BOARD MAY NOT ADOPT ANY REGULATION, GUIDELINE, OR POLICY
THAT:
(1) UNNECESSARILY DELAYS THE RESOLUTION OF DISPUTES OVER
ELECTIONS, UNFAIR LABOR PRACTICES, OR ANY OTHER MATTER UNDER THIS TITLE;
OR
(2) RESTRICTS OR WEAKENS THE PROTECTIONS PROVIDED TO
EMPLOYEES AND EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATIONS UNDER THIS TITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the terms of the initial
members of the Maryland Labor Relations Board shall expire as follows:
(1) one member on the date that is 1 year after the effective date of this
Act;

HOUSE BILL 1539
(2) one member on the date that is 2 years after the effective date of this
Act;
(3) one member on the date that is 3 years after the effective date of this
Act;
(4) one member on the date that is 4 years after the effective date of this
Act; and
(5) one member on the date that is 5 years after the effective date of this
Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Sections 1 and 2 of this Act are contingent on:
(1) the federal National Labor Relations Act being fully repealed or
rendered null and void; or
(2) the National Labor Relations Board expressly ceding jurisdiction to the
State regarding any employer, employees, trade, industry, or labor dispute covered under
the federal National Labor Relations Act.
(b) (1) The Maryland Department of Labor shall monitor action by the federal
government to determine whether the contingency described in subsection (a) of this section
has been met.
(2) The Maryland Department of Labor shall notify the Department of
Legislative Services within 30 days after the contingency described under subsection (a) of
this section has been met.
(c) If the Department of Legislative Services receives notice from the Maryland
Department of Labor as described under subsection (b)(2) of this section, Sections 1 and 2
of this Act shall take effect on the date the notice is received by the Department of
Legislative Services.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 3 of this
Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2026.